test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_cuannja_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - čuánjá: # ok 
    čuánjá+N+Sg+Nom:  čuánjá
    čuánjá+N+Sg+Gen:  čuánnjáá
    čuánjá+N+Sg+Acc:  čuánnjáá
    čuánjá+N+Sg+Ill:  čuánnjái
    čuánjá+N+Sg+Loc:  čuánnjást
    čuánjá+N+Sg+Com:  čuánnjáin
    čuánjá+N+Sg+Abe:  čuánnjááttáá
    čuánjá+N+Ess:  [čuánnjájin, čuánnjágin, čuánnján] # xxx check
    čuánjá+N+Par:  [čuánnjájid, čuánnjágid, čuánnjád] # xxx check
    čuánjá+N+Pl+Nom:  čuánnjááh
    čuánjá+N+Pl+Gen:  čuánnjái
    čuánjá+N+Pl+Acc:  čuánnjáid
    čuánjá+N+Pl+Ill:  čuánnjáid
    čuánjá+N+Pl+Loc:  čuánnjáin
    čuánjá+N+Pl+Com:  [čuánnjáiguin, čuánnjáigijn]
    čuánjá+N+Pl+Abe:  čuánnjáittáá
